hr-HR: Vrsta školjke pojasa: Tvrda ljuska (hardshell); Hibrid; Meka ljuska (softshell); Ostalo
pl: Typ skorupy uprzęży: Hardshell; Hybryda; Softshell; Inny
sl-SI: Vrsta školjke trapeza: Trda lupina (Hardshell); Hibridna; Mehka lupina (Softshell); Drugo
pt-BR: Tipo de estrutura externa do trapézio: Hardshell; Híbrido; Softshell; Outro
da: Type af sele-skal: Hardshell; Hybrid; Softshell; Andet
th: ประเภทเปลือกหุ้มสายรัด: ฮาร์ดเชลล์; ไฮบริด; ซอฟต์เชลล์; อื่นๆ
ru: Тип оболочки страховочной системы: Жесткий каркас; Гибридный; Мягкий каркас; Другое
bg-BG: Тип корпус на хамута: Твърд корпус; Хибрид; Мек корпус; Друго
ja: ハーネスシェルタイプ: ハードシェル; ハイブリッド; ソフトシェル; その他
hu: A hám vázának típusa: Kemény héjú; Hibrid; Puha héjú; Egyéb
sk-SK: Typ plášťa postroja: Hardshell; Hybridná; Softshell; Iné
ko: 하네스 쉘 타입: 하드쉘; 하이브리드; 소프트쉘; 기타
it: tipo di guscio per imbracatura: Guscio rigido; Ibrido; Softshell; Altro
el: Τύπος δομής της ζώνης: Σκληρό περίβλημα; Υβριδικό; Μαλακό περίβλημα; Άλλο
fr: Type de coque du harnais: Coque rigide; Hybride; Coque souple; Autre
cs: Typ skořepiny trapézu: Pevná skořepina (hardshell); Hybridní; Měkká skořepina (softshell); Jiné
lt-LT: Diržo korpuso tipas: Kieto korpuso; Hibridinis; Minkšto korpuso; Kita
tr: Koşum takımı dış gövde tipi: Sert dış katman; Hibrit; Yumuşak dış katman; Diğer
zh-CN: 安全带外壳类型: 硬壳; 混合; 软壳; 其他
en: Harness shell type: Hardshell; Hybrid; Softshell; Other
de: Typ der Gurtschale: Hartschale; Hybrid; Softshell; Sonstige
es: Tipo de carcasa de arnés: Carcasa rígida; Híbrido; Carcasa blanda; Otro
zh-TW: 安全帶外殼類型: 硬殼; 混合; 軟殼; 其他
nl: Harnas schaal type: Hardshell; Hybride; Softshell; Overig
pt-PT: Tipo de concha do arnês: Hardshell; Híbrido; Softshell; Outro
ro-RO: Tipul carcasei hamului: Carcasă dură; Hibrid; Softshell; Altele
fi: Valjaiden ulkopinnan tyyppi: Kovakuorinen; Hybridi; Pehmeäkuorinen; Muu
vi: Loại vỏ đai: Vỏ cứng; Lai; Vỏ mềm; Khác
sv: Skaltyp för sele: Hårdskal; Hybrid; Mjukskal; Övrigt
nb: Seleskalltype: Hardshell; Hybrid; Softshell; Annet